Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3203
Section; applicability.

Section 30-3201 shall apply to fiduciary relationships whether now in existence or established after November 18, 1965.

Laws 1965, c. 113, § 2, p. 438;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-601.03.